California, session 20252026, AB7.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 13 (commencing with Section 66097) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 13. Admissions Preference for Descendants of Slavery66097. (a) The California State University, the University of California, independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858, may consider providing a preference in admissions to an applicant who is a descendant of slavery. This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that it does not conflict with federal law.(b) For purposes of this section, “descendant of slavery” means an individual who can establish direct lineage to a person who, before 1900, was subjected to American chattel slavery and meets at least one of the following criteria:(1) Was emancipated through legal or extralegal means, including self-purchase, manumission, legislative action, military service, or judicial ruling.(2) Obtained freedom through gradual abolition statutes or constitutional amendments.(3) Was classified as a fugitive from bondage under federal or state law.(4) Was deemed contraband by military authorities.(5) Rendered military or civic service while subject to legal restrictions based on ancestry historically associated with slavery.